Utah statutes.
26-4-13.   Autopsies -- When authorized.
(1) The medical examiner shall perform an autopsy to:
(a)  aid in the discovery and prosecution of a crime;
(b)  protect an innocent person accused of a crime; and
(c)  disclose hazards to public health.
(2)  The medical examiner may perform an autopsy:
(a)  to aid in the administration of civil justice in life and accident
insurance problems in accordance with Title 34A, Chapter 2, Workers'
Compensation Act;
(b)  in other cases involving questions of civil liability.
